Nevada, session 83, SB308.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 396.544 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.544 1. The Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada may grant a waiver of registration fees , [and] laboratory
fees and any other mandatory fees for classes taken towards
satisfying the requirements of an undergraduate or graduate
degree at a school within the System for any member of the active
Nevada National Guard, including, without limitation, a recruit . [,
who attends a school within the System as a full-time or part-time
student.]
2. A member of the active Nevada National Guard who has
reenlisted may, in lieu of using the waiver himself or herself and
regardless of whether the member was granted a waiver pursuant to
this section before reenlistment:
(a) Assign such a waiver to his or her spouse or child for [credits
applicable toward the course work required for the award to the
spouse or child of an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree or
certificate at any] classes taken towards satisfying the requirements
of an undergraduate or graduate degree at a school within the
System.
(b) Reassign such a waiver to his or her spouse or child, as
applicable, if the person to whom the waiver was assigned pursuant
to paragraph (a) does not use the waiver to attend a school within
the System . [as a full-time or part-time student.]
 For each period of reenlistment of a member, the benefit
provided pursuant to this subsection may only be used by one
eligible person.
3. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom a waiver is granted, assigned or reassigned pursuant
to subsection 1 or 2, including, without limitation, tuition charges
pursuant to NRS 396.540, such a person shall be deemed to be a
bona fide resident of this State.
4. A person must be a member in good standing of the active
Nevada National Guard, including, without limitation, a recruit, at
the beginning of and throughout the entire semester for which the
waiver is granted.
5. A person to whom a waiver is granted, assigned or
reassigned pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must maintain at least a 2.0
grade point average, on a 4.0 grading scale, each semester for which
the waiver is granted, assigned or reassigned, or the equivalent of a
2.0 grade point average if a different grading scale is used.
6. The Board of Regents may request the Adjutant General to
verify the membership in the active Nevada National Guard of a
-
*SB308*

– 3 –
person who is seeking or has been granted a waiver of registration
fees , [and] laboratory fees and other mandatory fees pursuant to
subsection 1.
7. The Adjutant General shall:
(a) Upon receiving a request from the Board of Regents
pursuant to subsection 6, notify the Board of Regents in writing
concerning the status and dates of membership of a person who is
seeking or has been granted a waiver of registration fees , [and]
laboratory fees and other mandatory fees pursuant to subsection 1.
(b) Maintain a record of any waiver that has been granted,
assigned or reassigned pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 and the person
to whom the waiver was assigned or reassigned.
(c) Before the beginning of each semester, certify in writing to
the Board of Regents that a waiver has been properly assigned or
reassigned to the person seeking to use the waiver . [to attend a
school within the System.]
8. If a waiver is granted pursuant to subsection 1 for a recruit
and the recruit does not enter full-time National Guard duty within 1
year after enlisting, the recruit shall reimburse the Board of Regents
for all registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and other mandatory
fees waived on behalf of the recruit if the recruit’s failure to enter
full-time National Guard duty is attributable to his or her own
conduct.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Full-time National Guard duty” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 32 U.S.C. § 101(19).
(b) “Recruit” means a person who has enlisted in the Nevada
National Guard but has not begun his or her required military duty.
(c) “Spouse” includes a domestic partner as set forth in
NRS 122A.200.
Sec. 2. NRS 396.5442 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5442 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of
registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees for classes taken towards satisfying the requirements of an
undergraduate or graduate degree at a school within the System
for a child, widow or widower of a person who was killed while
performing his or her duties as a member of the Nevada National
Guard. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom such a waiver is granted, including, without
limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person shall
be deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
2. A person is eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 if
the person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
grading scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point
average if a different scale is used.
-
*SB308*

– 4 –
3. A child may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section for
10 years after the child attains the age of 18 years or, if the child
enrolls in the System before the age of 18 years, for 10 years after
the date of such enrollment. A widow or widower may use a waiver
granted pursuant to this section for 10 years after the date of the
death of the member.
4. The Board of Regents may request the Adjutant General to
verify that a person is the child, widow or widower of a person who
was killed while performing his or her duties as a member of the
Nevada National Guard. The Adjutant General shall, upon receiving
such a request, notify the Board of Regents in writing concerning
the status of that person.
Sec. 3. NRS 396.5443 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5443 1. The Board of Regents shall grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees [assessed each semester against] for classes taken
towards satisfying the requirements of an undergraduate or
graduate degree at a school within the System for a student who is:
(a) A veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States who has
been awarded the Purple Heart; or
(b) The child of such a veteran, if:
(1) The veteran is a bona fide resident of this State, or was a
bona fide resident of this State at the time of his or her death; and
(2) The child of the veteran graduated from a high school
located in this State.
2. The amount of the waiver must be equal to:
(a) If the student is entitled to receive any federal educational
benefits for a semester, the balance of registration fees, laboratory
fees and any other mandatory fees assessed against the student that
remain unpaid after the student’s account has been credited with the
full amount of the federal educational benefits to which the student
is entitled for that semester; or
(b) If the student is not entitled to receive any federal
educational benefits for a semester, the full amount of the
registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed against the student for that semester.
3. [The waiver must be granted to a student who enrolls in any
program offered by a school within the System, including, without
limitation, a trade or vocational program, a graduate program or a
professional program.
4.] For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
student to whom a waiver is granted pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS
396.540, such a student shall be deemed to be a bona fide resident of
this State.
-
*SB308*

– 5 –
[5.] 4. The Board of Regents may grant more favorable waivers
of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees for
classes taken towards satisfying the requirements of an
undergraduate or graduate degree for veterans of the Armed
Forces of the United States who have been awarded the Purple Heart
or the child of such a veteran than the waiver provided pursuant to
this section if required for the receipt of federal money.
[6.] 5. A child of a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United
States who has been awarded the Purple Heart may use a waiver
granted pursuant to this section for 10 years after the child attains 18
years of age, or, if the child enrolls in the System before attaining 18
years of age, for 10 years after the date of such enrollment.
Sec. 4. NRS 396.5445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5445 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of
registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees for classes taken towards satisfying the requirements of an
undergraduate or graduate degree at a school within the System
for a spouse or child of a person who is identified as a prisoner of
war or missing in action while performing his or her duties as a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States. For the purpose
of assessing fees and charges against a person to whom such a
waiver is granted, including, without limitation, tuition charges
pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person shall be deemed to be a bona
fide resident of this State.
2. A person is eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 if
the person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
grading scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point
average if a different scale is used.
3. A spouse may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section
for 10 years after the date on which the member of the Armed
Forces was identified as a prisoner of war or missing in action. A
child may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section for 10 years
after the child attains the age of 18 years or, if the child enrolls in
the System before the age of 18 years, for 10 years after the date of
such enrollment.
4. The Board of Regents may request such documentation as it
deems necessary to verify that a person is the spouse or child of a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is identified
as a prisoner of war or missing in action while performing his or her
duties as a member of the Armed Forces.
Sec. 5. NRS 396.5448 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5448 1. The Board of Regents may grant a waiver of
registration fees , [and] laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees for classes taken towards satisfying the requirements of an
undergraduate or graduate degree at a school within the System
-
*SB308*

– 6 –
for a person who is identified as a homeless or unaccompanied
pupil. For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a person
to whom such a waiver is granted, including, without limitation,
tuition charges pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person shall be
deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
2. A person is eligible for a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 if
the person maintains at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
grading scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point
average if a different scale is used.
3. A person may use a waiver granted pursuant to subsection 1
for 10 years after the person attains the age of 18 years or, if the
person enrolls in the System before the age of 18 years, for 10 years
after the date of such enrollment.
4. The Board of Regents may request documentation from a
person requesting a waiver pursuant to subsection 1 as it deems
necessary to verify that such a person was a homeless or
unaccompanied pupil.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Homeless pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“homeless children and youths” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(b) “Unaccompanied pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “unaccompanied youth” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(6).
Sec. 6. NRS 396.5449 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5449 1. The Board of Regents shall grant a waiver of the
payment of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other
mandatory fees [assessed each semester against] for classes taken
towards satisfying the requirements of an undergraduate or
graduate degree at a school within the System for a student who:
(a) Is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation
or certified by the enrollment department of such a tribe or nation or
by the Bureau of Indian Affairs as being a descendant of an enrolled
member of a tribe or nation, regardless of membership status;
(b) Is eligible for enrollment in a school within the System ; [,
including, without limitation, enrollment in a dual credit course
through a program for dual credit;]
(c) Is:
(1) A bona fide resident of this State, as defined in
NRS 396.540;
(2) A member or descendant of an enrolled member of an
Indian tribe or nation, all or part of which is located within the
boundaries of this State; or
(3) Currently a resident on qualified tribal land, whether his
or her actual residence was located within or outside of the
boundaries of this State, and has been such a resident for not less
than 1 year;
-
*SB308*

– 7 –
(d) Has maintained at least a 2.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
scale, each semester or the equivalent of a 2.0 grade point average if
a different scale is used; and
(e) Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid
provided for by 20 U.S.C. § 1090 . [unless the student is or will be
enrolled exclusively in one or more dual credit courses through a
program for dual credit.]
2. [The amount of the waiver must be equal to the full amount
of the registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed against the student for that semester.
3. The waiver must be granted to a student who enrolls in any
course or program, whether for a degree or not, offered by a school
within the System, including, without limitation, a trade or
vocational program, a graduate program, a professional program or
a dual credit course through a program for dual credit, offered
during any academic period, including courses offered during the
summer and between terms or semesters.
4.] For the purpose of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom such a waiver is granted, including, without
limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS 396.540, the person
shall be deemed to be a bona fide resident of this State.
[5.] 3. The Board of Regents may request documentation
confirming that the student is a member or descendant of a member
of a federally recognized Indian tribe or nation.
[6.] 4. As used in this section [:
(a) “Program for dual credit” means a program through which a
pupil enrolled in high school, including, without limitation, a pupil
enrolled in grade 9, 10, 11 or 12 in a charter school or a pupil
enrolled in a program designed to meet the requirements of an adult
standard diploma, may enroll in a dual credit course offered by a
school within the System.
(b) “Qualified] , “qualified tribal land” means any real property:
[(1)] (a) For which legal title is vested in, or held in trust for
the benefit of, an Indian tribe or an individual Native American, and
which is subject to restrictions against alienation pursuant to federal
law; and
[(2)] (b) Over which a federally recognized Indian tribe or
nation, all or part of which is located within the boundaries of this
State, exercises governmental power.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB308*